src/adj-ces-lex.txt
LEXICON Adjective
 SUPPREF ; !superlative
 ADJLEX ; 

LEXICON SUPPREF !superlative
@P.Sup.ON@:nej@P.Sup.ON@ ADJLEX ;
@P.Sup.ON@:nej@P.Sup.ON@ NEGPREF ;

LEXICON NEGPREF
Neg+:ne NEGADJ ;
!        oNEGADJ ;

LEXICON ADJLEX
rychly:rychl RYCHLY ;

LEXICON NEGADJ
!mely:mel NEMELY ;
 KOREN ; !positive roots
 NEGKOREN ; !roots with negation

LEXICON KOREN 
rychly:rychl RYCHLY ;

LEXICON NEGKOREN
# ;


!LEXICON NEMELY
!# ;
